Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202672-818
State-owned land; utility easement; director; department; powers and duties.

Except as provided in section 37-330, a state agency shall submit any request for granting a utility easement on state-owned land to the Director of Administrative Services. Utility easements may only be granted to political subdivisions or their contractors for utility or construction-related purposes. The director shall certify the approval of a utility easement and shall execute the instrument necessary to grant the utility easement. The state building division of the department shall be responsible for the implementation of easements granted under this section.

Laws 1995, LB 567, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB256, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 39.
July 1, 2026